California, session 20252026, AB993.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25404.8 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25404.8. (a) (1) In a county for which a CUPA has not been certified on or before January 1, 2000, and where the unified program is implemented pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3, the CUPA is eligible for an allocation pursuant to subdivision (d).(2) The CUPA shall institute a single fee system that meets the requirements of Section 25404.5, except that the amounts to be paid by each person regulated by the unified program under the single fee system shall be set at a level so that the revenues collected under the single fee system and the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (d) are sufficient to pay the necessary costs incurred by the CUPA in implementing the unified program. The CUPA shall determine the level to be paid by persons regulated under the unified program by conducting a workload analysis that establishes the direct and indirect costs to the CUPA of implementing the unified program.(b) A CUPA that implements the unified program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3 shall use the funding allocated pursuant to subdivision (d) to implement the unified program within the jurisdiction of the CUPA in accordance with the implementation agreement reached with the secretary pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3.(c) The Rural CUPA Reimbursement Account is hereby established in the General Fund and the secretary may expend the money in the account to make the allocations specified in subdivision (d).(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the secretary shall allocate the following amounts from the Rural CUPA Reimbursement Account to an eligible county:(A) If the county has a population of less than 70,000 persons, the amount of the funds allocated from the account shall not exceed 75 percent of the budgeted costs as approved by the local governing body for implementation of the unified program.(B) If the county has a population of more than 70,000, but less than 100,000 persons, the amount of the funds allocated from the account shall not exceed 50 percent of the budgeted costs as approved by the local governing body for implementation of the unified program.(C) If the county has a population of more than 100,000, but less than 150,000 persons, the amount of the funds allocated from the account shall not exceed 35 percent of the budgeted costs as approved by the local governing body for implementation of the unified program.(2) The secretary shall not allocate more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for all CUPAs in an eligible county.(e) Contingent upon an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), every county that has a population of less than 150,000 shall be eligible for funding pursuant to subdivision (d).